Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.220

Legislative—Franchises—Referendum.

No franchise or right to occupy or use the streets, highways, bridges or other public places shall be granted, renewed, or extended except by ordinance and every such ordinance complete in the form in which it is finally passed shall remain on file with the city clerk for at least one week before final passage and if the franchise or grant is for interurban or street railways, gas or waterworks, electric light or power plants, heating plants, telegraph or telephone systems or other public service utilities, the ordinance must be submitted to a vote of the people at a general or special election and approved by a majority of those voting thereon.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.220. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 16, part; RRS s 9105, part.]

NOTES:

Times for holding elections: RCW 29A.04.311 through 29A.04.330.